Utah statutes.
59-1-209.   Official seal -- Authenticated copies of records as evidence.

The commission shall adopt an official seal, and shall file an impression and description of the seal with the Division of Archives.  Copies of any records in the possession of the commission may be authenticated with the seal of the commission attested by the signature of the commission's administrative secretary, and when so authenticated shall be received in evidence to the same extent and with the same effect as the originals.



Enacted by Chapter 4, 1987 General Session

